Hawaii statutes.
[§431:2-409] Mandatory reporting.
(a) Within sixty days of an insurer or other licensee's employee or agent
discovering credible information indicating a violation of section 431:2-403,
or as soon thereafter as practicable, the insurer or licensee shall provide to
the branch information, including documents and other evidence, regarding the
alleged violation of section 431:2-403. The insurance fraud investigations
branch shall work with the insurer or licensee to determine what information
shall be provided.

(b) Information provided pursuant to this
section shall be protected from public disclosure to the extent authorized by
chapter 92F and section 431:2-209; provided that the branch may release the
information in an administrative or judicial proceeding to enforce this part to
federal, state, or local law enforcement or regulatory authorities, the
National Association of Insurance Commissioners, the National Insurance Crime
Bureau, or an insurer or other licensee aggrieved by the alleged violation of
section 431:2-403. [L 2009, c 149, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next